Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 4. Construction of Works

§ 41-9-260.
Bidding procedure when cost over $500.00.

In all cases where the work to be done at any one time under the direction of the commissioners shall, in their opinion, cost to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), the same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the commissioner shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice published in some newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1) or more newspapers published elsewhere. If there be no newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly set forth the time and place when and where the bids advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 81; C.S. 1920, § 1076; R.S. 1931, § 122-888; C.S. 1945, § 71-1551; W.S. 1957, § 41-442.

Cross references. —

As to cost of construction, see §

41-9-215

.

As to costs of repairs, see §

41-9-219

.

§ 41-9-261.
Commissioners not to have financial interest in construction contracts.

While in office no commissioner shall be interested directly or indirectly:

In any contract for the construction of any drain, ditch, levee or other work in a drainage district;

In the sale of materials used for any work in a drainage district; or

In the wages of or supplies for men or teams employed on any work in a drainage district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 82; C.S. 1920, § 1077; R.S. 1931, § 122-889; C.S. 1945, § 71-1552; W.S. 1957, § 41-443; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

rewrote the section, which formerly read: “And they [the commissioners] shall not during their term of office, be interested directly or indirectly in any contract for the construction of any drain, ditch, levee or other work in such drainage district, or in the sale of materials therefor, or in the wages of or supplies for men or teams employed on any such work in said district.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-9-262.
Entry of commissioners on land; payment of damages to owner.

The damages allowed to the owners of lands shall be paid or tendered before the commissioners shall be authorized to enter upon the lands, for damage to which the award is made, for the construction of any drains, ditches or levees proposed thereon. If the owner is unknown or there shall be a contest in regard to the ownership of the lands, or the owner will not receive payment, or there exists a mortgage or other lien against the same, or the commissioners cannot for any other reason pay him, they may deposit the said damages with the clerk of the court, for the benefit of the owner, or parties interested, to be paid or distributed as the court shall direct, and such payment shall have the same effect as the tender to and acceptance of the damages awarded by the true owner of the land. This section shall not, however, prevent said commissioners, their agents, servants and employees going upon said lands to do any and all work found necessary prior to making their assessment of benefits and award of damages, and the trial on their report thereof.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 83; C.S. 1920, § 1078; R.S. 1931, § 122-890; C.S. 1945, § 71-1553; W.S. 1957, § 41-444.

§ 41-9-263.
Location of drains.

When practicable said drains herein provided for shall be laid out and constructed on the side of public highways.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 84; C.S. 1920, § 1079; R.S. 1931, § 122-891; C.S. 1945, § 71-1554; W.S. 1957, § 41-445.

§ 41-9-264.
Drained lands outside of district; commissioners' report requesting assessments.

Whenever any drained lands outside a drainage district are receiving the benefits of the drains of said district, by direct or indirect, natural or artificial connection therewith, the commissioners of said district may report said facts to the court and ask that said lands, describing them, be brought into said district and assessed for the benefits by them received from the drains, ditches or levees of said district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 85; C.S. 1920, § 1080; R.S. 1931, § 122-892; C.S. 1945, § 71-1555; W.S. 1957, § 41-446.

Inclusion of unintentionally omitted lands. —

This section is the vehicle by which lands unintentionally omitted at the time of the organization of a drainage district may later be brought in when it becomes apparent that such lands are directly affected. In re Big Bend Drainage Dist., 418 P.2d 784,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1966).

Amended report. —

Where facts required by this section are not fully set forth, the court may properly require that it be done by an amended report before the owners are required to take issue on the facts thus alleged, as directed in §

41-9-266

.In re Big Bend Drainage Dist., 418 P.2d 784,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1966).

Upon showing that outside lands are benefited by district's drains, which are not fully covered in the commissioners' report, trial court may require an amendment to the report before the owners need take issue on the facts as alleged. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Showing of objections. —

Under §

41-9-265

, where the trial court is satisfied with the facts presented by the district under the requirements of this section, the burden is then upon the landowners to show why their lands should not be brought into the district and assessed for benefits. In re Big Bend Drainage Dist., 418 P.2d 784,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1966).

Owners are required to show in their remonstrances against approval of commissioners' report, that their lands are not benefited by the district's drains. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Supplementary proceeding. —

A petition for the inclusion of outside lands in a drainage district, with a general reference to the district as organized, is a supplementary proceeding after organization of the district and not an original proceeding. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 41-9-265.
Drained lands outside of district; court order to landowners to show cause.

Upon the filing of said report the court shall order the owners of such lands to be notified of the filing of said report and the contents thereof, and shall require such owners to show cause at a time and place therein fixed, not less than twenty (20) days thereafter, why their said lands should not be brought into said district and assessed for said benefits.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 86; C.S. 1920, § 1081; R.S. 1931, § 122-893; C.S. 1945, § 71-1556; W.S. 1957, § 41-447.

§ 41-9-266.
Drained lands outside of district; hearings; remonstrances; trial on issues.

At the time and place fixed for hearing said report any of said landowners may appear and remonstrate against the confirmation of said report. All remonstrances shall be in writing, verified and shall set forth the facts on which they are based. All issues arising on said report shall be tried by the court without a jury.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 87; C.S. 1920, § 1082; R.S. 1931, § 122-894; C.S. 1945, § 71-1557; W.S. 1957, § 41-448.

§ 41-9-267.
Drained lands outside of district; hearings; findings; annexation to district.

If the court shall find that said lands or any of them are receiving the benefits of any such drain, ditch or levee, the court shall so find in writing and shall order said lands to be annexed to and made a part of said district and benefits to be assessed against the same by the commissioners of said district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 88; C.S. 1920, § 1083; R.S. 1931, § 122-895; C.S. 1945, § 71-1558; W.S. 1957, § 41-449.

§ 41-9-268.
Drained lands outside of district; effect of court order; appeal.

Said order shall be final and conclusive unless appealed from the supreme court within thirty (30) days from the date of entry thereof.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 89; C.S. 1920, § 1084; R.S. 1931, § 122-896; C.S. 1945, § 71-1559; W.S. 1957, § 41-450.

§ 41-9-269.
Drained lands outside of district; levy of assessments by commissioners.

Said commissioners shall, after the time for appeal is past, assess against each parcel, tract and easement of and in said annexed lands reasonable and just benefits, and shall assess against said lands for construction and repairs such sum as shall be just. If lands similarly situated and benefited are found in said district the annexed lands shall be assessed a like sum of benefits and damages as said lands in the said district to which they are sought to be annexed, and a sum for construction of said work which shall be equal to all sums assessed for the complete construction of the drainage system in the district to which they are sought to be annexed against lands having the same assessment of benefits in said district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 90; C.S. 1920, § 1085; R.S. 1931, § 122-897; C.S. 1945, § 71-1560; W.S. 1957, § 41-451.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits, approved by court, without notice, for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-270.
Drained lands outside of district; filing of commissioners’ assessment report; hearing; trial; amendment or confirmation of report.

The commissioners shall file their said report and assessments in court. The court shall by order require said owners to show cause at a time and place therein fixed, not less than twenty (20) days after the service of said order, why said report and assessments should not be confirmed. And on the hearing on said order to show cause if a jury trial is demanded the court shall frame issues on benefits and damages and empanel a jury or adjourn the hearing thereon until a jury is in attendance and take the verdict of a jury on such issues. All other issues arising on said report shall be tried by the court. The court shall order all necessary amendments of said report and make written findings of fact and when said report is amended shall by order confirm the same.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 91; C.S. 1920, § 1086; R.S. 1931, § 122-898; C.S. 1945, § 71-1561; W.S. 1957, § 41-452; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the third sentence, substituted "hearing thereon until a jury" for "hearing thereon until some term of court when a jury."

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice, for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detail plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Amendment to report. —

Upon showing that outside lands are benefited by district's drains, which are not fully covered in the commissioners' report, trial court may require amendment to the report before the owners need take issue on facts as alleged. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Owners must show that lands not benefited. —

Owners are required to show in their remonstrances against approval of commissioners' report, that their lands are not benefited by the district's drains. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Supplementary proceeding. —

A petition for the inclusion of outside lands in a drainage district, with a general reference to the district as organized, is a supplementary proceeding after organization of the district and not an original proceeding. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 41-9-271.
Drains across railroad rights-of-way; generally.

Said commissioners shall have the right to lay out and construct all necessary drains, ditches and levees across any railway right-of-way or yards in their district, and any railway company, whose right-of-way or yards crosses the line of any proposed drain, ditch or levee, shall open its right-of-way or yards and permit such drain, ditch or levee to cross the same, as soon as said drain, ditch or levee is constructed to such right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 71; C.S. 1920, § 1066; R.S. 1931, § 122-869; C.S. 1945, § 71-1532; W.S. 1957, § 41-453.

Cross references. —

As to rights-of-way of railroads generally, see §§

37-9-203

through

37-9-205

.

§ 41-9-272.
Drains across railroad rights-of-way; liability of district to railroad.

Every drainage district shall be liable to the railway company, whose right-of-way or yard any of its drains, ditches or levees crosses, for the reasonable cost of the culverts and bridges, made necessary by said drain, ditch or levee, crossing said right-of-way or yards, but of not more expensive character than the average other culverts and bridges on said division of railway, crossing streams or ditches of approximately the same width and depth, and within a hundred (100) miles of said district ditches.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 72; C.S. 1920, § 1067; R.S. 1931, § 122-870; C.S. 1945, § 71-1533; W.S. 1957, § 41-454.

§ 41-9-273.
Drains across railroad rights-of-way; railroads to grant free access; failure to comply.

Upon receiving fifteen (15) days notice in writing, any railway company, across whose right-of-way or yard any such drain, ditch or levee is laid out shall open its right-of-way or yards, and permit said commissioners and their contractors, agents and employes [employees] to construct said drain, ditch or levee, across said right-of-way or yards. For every day that said railroad company fails, after the end of said fifteen (15) days, to open their said right-of-way or yard, as hereinbefore required, it shall forfeit twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to said drainage district, to be collected in an action, as other forfeitures are collected, or set off against any damages that have been awarded to such company. If said railway company fails to open its right-of-way or yard along the line of said drainage district, drain, ditch or levee, the commissioners may, at any time after the expiration of said fifteen (15) days, open such right-of-way and yard along the line of said drains, ditches and levees, and construct the same.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 73; C.S. 1920, § 1068; R.S. 1931, § 122-871; C.S. 1945, § 71-1534; W.S. 1957, § 41-455.

§ 41-9-274.
Petition for reconstruction, enlargement, extension or improvement; filing by commissioners; contents.

If, after the completion of work on any drainage system under the provisions of this act, it shall become necessary to reconstruct, enlarge, extend or improve the said system in order to protect or reclaim any part of the district from waste or seepage water, the commissioners of said district may file in the court, in which the original proceedings were had, a petition setting forth:

The necessity for the proposed work describing the necessity;

A general description of the proposed work;

A general description of the starting point routes and termini of any new ditches, drains, levees or other work proposed to be constructed;

The names of owners of all lands through or over which any such ditch, drain, levee or other work is proposed to be constructed, so far as such names are known to the petitioners;

That the proposed work will promote public health and welfare;

That the total benefit from the proposed work will exceed the cost, together with the damages resulting therefrom, taking into consideration all benefits and all damages resulting therefrom both within and without said district;

A prayer that the commissioners be authorized to proceed with the proposed work.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 122-878; C.S. 1945, § 71-1541; W.S. 1957, § 41-456.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see note to §

41-9-110

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-9-275.
Petition for construction; filing by landowners in lieu of commissioners.

If, in any such case, the commissioners fail or refuse to file such petition, the same may with like effect be signed and filed by not less than fifty percent (50%) of the owners of land within the district, or by the owners representing not less than fifty percent (50%) in area of the lands therein.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 122-879; C.S. 1945, § 71-1542; W.S. 1957, § 41-457.

§ 41-9-276.
Petition; hearing procedures generally.

Upon the filing of such petition like proceedings shall be had as in the case of the filing of the preliminary report of the commissioners, except that the boundaries and organization of the district shall in no way be affected by the proceeding and except that in the notice of hearing shall state the names of the owners of lands over or through which any ditch, drain, levee or other work is proposed to be constructed as stated in the petition, which owners shall be served with said notice as provided for serving of notice of hearing on the petition for organization of the district and if the petition is filed by landowners, the commissioners also shall be served with notice in like manner.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 122-880; C.S. 1945, § 71-1543; W.S. 1957, § 41-458.

§ 41-9-277.
Petition; procedure when petition granted.

If, upon the hearing, the prayer of the petition shall be granted, like proceedings shall be had in all respects as in case of the confirmation of the preliminary report of the commissioners, except that the boundaries and organizations of the district shall not be affected by the proceedings and any costs taxed against the petitioners therein shall be paid by the district, if the petition was filed by the commissioners. If, upon the hearing of the final report of the commissioners, the proposed work or any part thereof is by the court ordered to be done, all subsequent proceedings with respect to the doing thereof and the payment therefor shall be governed by the provisions of the statute applicable in cases of original construction work.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 122-881; C.S. 1945, § 71-1544; W.S. 1957, § 41-459.

§ 41-9-278.
Petition; assessments.

In making their assessments of benefits and for the work to be done under the provisions of this amendment, the commissioners shall regard the proposed work as an integral part of an entire system, and shall take into consideration all assessments of benefits and for construction previously made, in order that, insofar as practicable, no part of the district shall bear an unjust portion of the total cost of the entire system.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 122-882; C.S. 1945, § 71-1545; W.S. 1957, § 41-460.

Cross references. —

As to assessments generally, see §§

41-9-240

through

41-9-259

.